Utah statutes.
57-18-4.   Requirements for creation.
(1)  Any property owner may grant a conservation easement to any other
qualified person as defined in Section 57-18-3 in the same manner and with the
same effect as any other conveyance of an interest in real property.
(2)  A conservation easement shall be in writing and shall be recorded in the
office of the recorder of the county in which the easement is granted.
(3)  The instrument that creates a conservation easement shall identify and
describe the land subject to the conservation easement by legal description,
specify the purpose for which the easement is created, and include a
termination date or a statement that the easement continue in perpetuity.
(4)  Any qualified person, as defined in Section 57-18-3, that receives a
conservation easement shall disclose to the easement's grantor, at least three
days prior to the granting of the easement, the types of conservation
easements available, the legal effect of each easement, and that the grantor
should contact an attorney concerning any possible legal and tax implications
of granting a conservation easement.
